Wyoming statutes. Title 11 Agriculture, Livestock and Other Animals
Chapter 42 Agricultural Grain Marketing [Repealed]

§ 11-42-101.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1997,
ch. 55, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1987, ch. 61, § 1, enacted the Interstate Compact on Agricultural Grain Marketing.

§ 11-42-102.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1998,
ch. 34, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws, 1997, ch. 31, § 1, related to the filing of the compact report on agricultural grain marketing.